Maryland, session 2026, HB0032.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
3–510.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “AUTOMATED EXTERNAL DEFIBRILLATOR” MEANS A
MEDICAL HEART MONITOR AND DEFIBRILLATOR DEVICE THAT:
(1) IS CLEARED FOR MARKET BY THE FEDERAL FOOD AND DRUG
ADMINISTRATION;
(2) RECOGNIZES THE PRESENCE OR ABSENCE OF VENTRICULAR
FIBRILLATION OR RAPID VENTRICULAR TACHYCARDIA;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0032*

HOUSE BILL 32
(3) DETERMINES, WITHOUT INTERVENTION BY AN OPERATOR,
WHETHER DEFIBRILLATION SHOULD BE PERFORMED;
(4) ON DETERMINING THAT DEFIBRILLATION SHOULD BE
PERFORMED, AUTOMATICALLY CHARGES; AND
(5) (I) REQUIRES OPERATOR INTERVENTION TO DELIVER THE
ELECTRICAL IMPULSE; OR
(II) AUTOMATICALLY CONTINUES WITH DELIVERY OF THE
ELECTRICAL IMPULSE.
(B) EACH LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT VEHICLE SHALL CARRY AN
AUTOMATED EXTERNAL DEFIBRILLATOR.
(C) A LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY SHALL MAINTAIN THE
FUNCTIONALITY OF EACH AUTOMATED EXTERNAL DEFIBRILLATOR DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.